Louisiana, session 2026, HB1139.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 28:53.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§53.1. Discharge Requirements; medical evaluation; discharge plan; healthcare
provider notification requirements
A. If a patient is admitted for inpatient behavioral healthcare services
pursuant to an emergency certificate issued in accordance with R.S. 28:53, the
admitting healthcare facility shall provide certain services upon admission and
discharge.
B. Within seventy-two hours of admission, the healthcare facility shall do
all of the following:
(1) Ensure that a licensed healthcare professional conducts a behavioral
health evaluation of the patient for underlying behavioral conditions.
(2) Contact the patient's primary healthcare provider or licensed healthcare
professional providing behavioral health services, if known, to establish a patient
treatment history.
C. Upon discharge, the individual who is responsible for discharge planning
at the healthcare facility where the patient has been admitted shall make a reasonable
effort to do all of the following:
(1) Provide written or telephonic notification to any healthcare professional
that is currently providing behavioral health services or primary care services to the
patient, if known, of the date and time that the patient is scheduled to be discharged
unless the patient objects to that information being communicated. If the patient
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1139 ENROLLED
does not have a healthcare professional who is currently providing behavioral health
services, the discharging healthcare facility shall refer the patient to the appropriate
healthcare service, including behavioral and primary care providers.
(2) Provide written or telephonic notification within twenty-four hours of
discharge to any healthcare professional that the patient is being referred to for
follow-up behavioral health services. The healthcare professional that the patient is
being referred to shall be provided with a summary of the patient's medical history
and any current mental health conditions that the patient is suffering from at the time
of discharge. The summary shall be transmitted no later than the date that the patient
has been scheduled for follow-up behavioral services.
(3) Provide to the patient educational documents published by the Louisiana
Department of Health prior to or at the time of discharge. The Louisiana Department
of Health shall create and publish educational documents that provide information
directed to the patient and the patient's family members, caregivers, or friends about
the warning signs of self-harm and the importance of seeking behavioral health
services after an admission pursuant to an emergency certificate has ended. The
documentation shall instruct the patient and the patient's family members, caregivers,
or friends to seek assistance from a healthcare professional to provide ongoing care
and clarify that medical privacy laws do not prevent a family member, friend, or
other loved one from communicating the patient's condition to a healthcare
professional treating the patient.
(4) Ensure that the patient is provided with the appropriate prescriptions.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.